District of Columbia statutes.
16-703

Process of Criminal Division; fees.

(a)

The Criminal Division of the Superior Court may issue process for the arrest of a person against whom an indictment is returned, an information is filed, or a complaint under oath is made.

(b)

Process shall —

(1)

be under the seal of the court;

(2)

bear teste in the name of a judge of the court, and

(3)

be signed by a clerk or employee of the court authorized to administer oaths.

(c)

In cases arising out of violations of any of the ordinances of the District of Columbia, process shall be directed to the Chief of Police, who shall execute the process and make return thereof in like manner as in other cases.

(d)

In all other criminal cases, the process issued by the Superior Court may be directed to the United States marshal or to the Chief of Police.

(e)

For services pursuant to subsection (d) of this section the marshal shall receive the fees prescribed by section 15-709(b).

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 558, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 556, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(d)(3)
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(e), 45 DCR 745
1981 Ed., § 16-703.
1973 Ed., § 16-703.